Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 46. Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

Sec. 13.46.010.
Scope and jurisdiction.

This chapter applies to a transfer that refers to this chapter in the designation under AS

13.46.080(a)

by which the transfer is made, if at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of this state or the custodial property is located in this state. The custodianship so created remains subject to this chapter despite a subsequent change in residence of a transferor, the minor, or the custodian, or the removal of custodial property from this state.

A person designated as custodian under this chapter is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state with respect to a matter relating to the custodianship.

A transfer that purports to be made and that is valid under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, or a substantially similar act of another state is governed by the law of the designated state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.020.
Nomination of custodian.

A person having the right to designate the recipient of property transferable upon the occurrence of a future event may revocably nominate a custodian to receive the property for a minor beneficiary upon the occurrence of the event by naming the custodian followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.” The nomination may name one or more persons as substitute custodians to whom the property must be transferred, in the order named, if the first nominated custodian dies before the transfer or is unable, declines, or is ineligible to serve. The nomination may be made in a will, a trust, a deed, an instrument exercising a power of appointment, or a writing designating a beneficiary of contractual rights that is registered with or delivered to the payor, issuer, or other obligor of the contractual rights.

A custodian nominated under this section must be a person to whom a transfer of property of that kind may be made under AS

13.46.080(a)

.

The nomination of a custodian under this section does not create custodial property until the nominating instrument becomes irrevocable or a transfer to the nominated custodian is completed under AS

13.46.080

. Unless the nomination of a custodian has been revoked, upon the occurrence of the future event the custodianship becomes effective and the custodian shall enforce a transfer of the custodial property under AS

13.46.080

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.030.
Transfer by gift or exercise of power of appointment.

A person may make a transfer by irrevocable gift to, or the irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment in favor of, a custodian for the benefit of a minor under AS

13.46.080

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.040.
Transfer authorized by will or trust.

A personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer under AS

13.46.080

to a custodian for the benefit of a minor as authorized in the governing will or trust.

If the testator or settlor has nominated a custodian under AS

13.46.020

to receive the custodial property, the transfer must be made to that person.

If the testator or settlor has not nominated a custodian under AS

13.46.020

, or all persons so nominated as custodian die before the transfer or are unable, decline, or are ineligible to serve, the personal representative or the trustee, as the case may be, shall designate the custodian from among those eligible to serve as custodian for property of that kind under AS

13.46.080(a)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.050.
Other transfer by fiduciary.

Subject to (c) of this section, a personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of a minor under AS

13.46.080

, in the absence of a will or under a will or trust that does not contain an authorization to do so.

Subject to (c) of this section, a conservator may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of the minor under AS

13.46.080

.

A transfer under (a) or (b) of this section may be made only if

the personal representative, trustee, or conservator considers the transfer to be in the best interest of the minor;

the transfer is not prohibited by or inconsistent with provisions of the applicable will, trust, agreement, or other governing instrument; and

the transfer is authorized by the court if it exceeds $25,000 in value.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.060.
Transfer by obligor.

Subject to (b) and (c) of this section, a person not subject to AS

13.46.040

or

13.46.050

who holds property of or owes a liquidated debt to a minor not having a conservator may make an irrevocable transfer to a custodian for the benefit of the minor under AS

13.46.080

.

If a person having the right to do so under AS

13.46.020

has nominated a custodian under that section to receive the custodial property, the transfer must be made to that person.

If a custodian has not been nominated under AS

13.46.020

, or all persons nominated as custodian die before the transfer or are unable, decline, or are ineligible to serve, a transfer under this section may be made to an adult member of the minor’s family or to a trust company unless the property exceeds $5,000 in value.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.070.
Receipt for custodial property.

A written receipt by a custodian constitutes a sufficient receipt and discharge for custodial property transferred to the custodian under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.080.
Manner of creating custodial property and effecting transfer; designation of initial custodian; control.

Custodial property is created and a transfer is made when

an uncertificated security or a certificated security in registered form is either

registered in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words §as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

delivered if in certificated form, or a document necessary for the transfer of an uncertificated security is delivered, together with any necessary endorsement to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company as custodian, accompanied by an instrument in substantially the form set out in (b) of this section;

money is paid or delivered to a broker or financial institution for credit to an account in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words — as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

the ownership of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract is either

registered with the issuer in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words — as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

assigned in a writing delivered to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company whose name in the assignment is followed in substance by the words — as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

an irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment or an irrevocable present right to future payment under a contract is the subject of a written notification delivered to the payor, issuer, or other obligor that the right is transferred to the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, whose name in the notification is followed in substance by the words §as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

an interest in real property is recorded in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words — as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”;

a certificate of title issued by a department or agency of a state or of the United States that evidences title to tangible personal property is either

issued in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words §as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

delivered to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company, endorsed to that person followed in substance by the words §as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

an interest in property not described in (1) — (6) of this subsection is transferred to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company by a written instrument in substantially the form set out in (b) of this section.

An instrument in the following form satisfies the requirements of (a)(1)(B) and (a)(7) of this section:

A transferor shall place the custodian in control of the custodial property as soon as practicable.

“TRANSFER UNDER THE ALASKA UNIFORM TRANSFERS TO MINORS ACT

I,
_____________________________________________________________________
(name of transferor or name and representative capacity if a fiduciary) hereby transfer to
_____________________________________
(name of custodian), as custodian for
_____________________________________
(name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, the following: (insert a description of the custodial property sufficient to identify it).

Dated:
_____________________________________

(Signature)

_____________________________________
(name of custodian) has received the property described above as custodian for the minor named above under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

Dated:
_____________________________________

_____________________________________________________________________ ”

(Signature of Custodian)

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.085.
Native corporations; custodians.

The stock or membership in a corporation organized under the law of this state under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) that a minor is entitled to receive under that Act shall be held by a custodian.

A person making a transfer of stock, whether by gift, devise, or other method, may nominate a custodian. In the absence of a nomination, the custodian shall be determined under the order of priority set out below. The appointment becomes effective upon the corporation’s receipt of the custodian’s written consent to the appointment. The order of priority is:

the legal guardian, if any, of the minor;

a parent, if any, of the minor, as selected by the parents;

an adult member of the minor’s family; in this paragraph, “member of the minor’s family” has the meaning given in AS

13.46.990

, and also includes members of a family with whom the minor has customarily lived.

For good cause, a district court or the superior court may vary the order of priority set out in (b) of this section or appoint another suitable person as custodian.

The custodianship is governed by this chapter, as modified by the following:

[Repealed, § 12 ch 60 SLA 1992.]

under AS

13.46.150

, a third person is responsible for determining whether stock is inalienable under the Act;

the custodian shall give an appropriate receipt for property received for the minor;

the custodian may not alienate inalienable property except within the limits provided by law;

the form of registration or title shall be “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act”;

a custodian may not receive compensation except, upon application to and approval by the superior court, for unusual and extraordinary services;

custodial property includes securities, money, and other real and personal property under supervision as a consequence of the Act.

Notwithstanding AS

13.46.190

, the stock shall be transferred to the minor when the minor reaches 18 years of age, or to the minor’s heirs if the minor dies before reaching 18 years of age.

In this section,

“Act” means 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act);

“minor” means an individual who is less than 18 years of age;

“stock” means the stock or membership in a corporation that is organized under the law of this state under the Act and that a minor is entitled to receive under the Act, whether by gift, devise, or other method; “stock” includes inchoate rights to stock.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990; am §§ 8 — 12 ch 60 SLA 1992; am §§ 23, 24 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) enacted as (f).
Relettered in 1992, at which time former subsection (e) was relettered as (f).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 13, ch. 60, SLA 1992, the amendments to (a), (b), and (f) of this section, the repeal of (d)(1) of this section, and the addition of (e) of this section, made by §§ 8-12, ch. 60, SLA 1992, are, to the extent constitutionally permissible, retroactive to January 1, 1991.

Sec. 13.46.090.
Single custodianship.

A transfer may be made only for one minor, and only one person may be the custodian.
All custodial property held under this chapter by the same custodian for the benefit of the same minor constitutes a single custodianship.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.100.
Validity and effect of transfer.

The validity of a transfer made in a manner prescribed in this chapter is not affected by

failure of the transferor to comply with AS

13.46.080(c)

concerning possession and control;

designation of an ineligible custodian, except designation of the transferor in the case of property for which the transferor is ineligible to serve as custodian under AS

13.46.080

(a); or

death or incapacity of a person nominated under AS

13.46.020

or designated under AS

13.46.080

as custodian or the disclaimer of the office by that person.

A transfer made under AS

13.46.080

is irrevocable, and the custodial property is indefeasibly vested in the minor, but the custodian has all the rights, powers, duties, and authority provided in this chapter, and neither the minor nor the minor’s legal representative has any right, power, duty, or authority with respect to the custodial property except as provided in this chapter.

By making a transfer, the transferor incorporates in the disposition all the provisions of this chapter and grants to the custodian, and to a third person dealing with a person designated as custodian, the respective powers, rights, and immunities provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.110.
Care of custodial property.

A custodian shall

take control of custodial property;

register or record title to custodial property if appropriate; and

collect, hold, manage, invest, and reinvest custodial property.

In dealing with custodial property, a custodian shall observe the standard of care that would be observed by a prudent person dealing with property of another and is not limited by any other statute, except AS

13.90.010

, restricting investments by fiduciaries. If a custodian has a special skill or expertise or is named custodian on the basis of representations of a special skill or expertise, the custodian shall use that skill or expertise. However, a custodian, in the custodian’s discretion and without liability to the minor or the minor’s estate, may retain custodial property received from a transferor.

A custodian may invest in or pay premiums on life insurance or endowment policies on

the life of the minor only if the minor or the minor’s estate is the sole beneficiary; or

the life of another person in whom the minor has an insurable interest only to the extent that the minor, the minor’s estate, or the custodian in the capacity of custodian, is the irrevocable beneficiary.

A custodian at all times shall keep custodial property separate and distinct from all other property in a manner sufficient to identify it clearly as custodial property of the minor. Custodial property consisting of an undivided interest is so identified if the minor’s interest is held as a tenant in common and is fixed. Custodial property subject to recordation is so identified if it is recorded, and custodial property subject to registration is so identified if it is either registered, or held in an account designated, in the name of the custodian, followed in substance by the words: “as a custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

A custodian shall keep records of all transactions with respect to custodial property, including information necessary for the preparation of the minor’s tax returns, and shall make them available for inspection at reasonable intervals by a parent or legal representative of the minor or by the minor if the minor has attained the age of 14 years.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.46.120.
Powers of custodian.

A custodian, acting in a custodial capacity, has all the rights, powers, and authority over custodial property that unmarried adult owners have over their own property, but a custodian may exercise those rights, powers, and authority in that capacity only.

This section does not relieve a custodian from liability for breach of AS

13.46.110

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.130.
Use of custodial property.

A custodian may deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor’s benefit as much of the custodial property as the custodian considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor, without court order and without regard to

the duty or ability of the custodian personally or of another person to support the minor; or

other income or property of the minor that may be applicable or available for that purpose.

On petition of an interested person or the minor if the minor has attained the age of 14 years, the court may order the custodian to deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor’s benefit as much of the custodial property as the court considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor.

A delivery, payment, or expenditure under this section is in addition to, not in substitution for, and does not affect an obligation of a person to support the minor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.140.
Custodian’s expenses, compensation, and bond.

A custodian is entitled to reimbursement from custodial property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the custodian’s duties.

Except for one who is a transferor under AS

13.46.030

, a custodian has a noncumulative election during each calendar year to charge reasonable compensation for services performed during that year.

Except as provided in AS

13.46.170(f)

, a custodian is not required to give a bond.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.150.
Exemption of third person from liability.

A third person in good faith and without court order may act on the instructions of or otherwise deal with a person purporting to make a transfer or purporting to act in the capacity of a custodian and, in the absence of knowledge, is not responsible for determining

the validity of the purported custodian’s designation;

the propriety of, or the authority under this chapter for, an act of the purported custodian;

the validity or propriety under this chapter of an instrument or instructions executed or given either by the person purporting to make a transfer or by the purported custodian; or

the propriety of the application of property of the minor delivered to the purported custodian.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.160.
Liability to third persons.

A claim based on (1) a contract entered into by a custodian acting in a custodial capacity, (2) an obligation arising from the ownership or control of custodial property, or (3) a tort committed during the custodianship, may be asserted against the custodial property by proceeding against the custodian in the custodial capacity, whether or not the custodian or the minor is personally liable.

A custodian is not personally liable

on a contract properly entered into in the custodial capacity unless the custodian fails to reveal that capacity and to identify the custodianship in the contract; or

for an obligation arising from control of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship unless the custodian is personally at fault.

A minor is not personally liable for an obligation arising from ownership of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship unless the minor is personally at fault.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.170.
Renunciation, resignation, death, or removal of custodian; designation of successor custodian.

A person nominated under AS

13.46.020

or designated under AS

13.46.080

as custodian may decline to serve by delivering a valid disclaimer to the person who made the nomination or to the transferor or the transferor’s legal representative. If the event giving rise to a transfer has not occurred and a substitute custodian able, willing, and eligible to serve was not nominated under AS

13.46.020

, the person who made the nomination may nominate a substitute custodian under AS 13.46.020; otherwise the transferor or the transferor’s legal representative shall designate a substitute custodian at the time of the transfer, in either case from among the persons eligible to serve as custodian for that kind of property under AS

13.46.080(a)

. The custodian so designated has the rights of a successor custodian.

A custodian at any time may designate a trust company or an adult other than a transferor under AS

13.46.030

as successor custodian by executing and dating an instrument of designation before a subscribing witness other than the successor. If the instrument of designation does not contain or is not accompanied by the resignation of the custodian, the designation of the successor does not take effect until the custodian resigns, dies, becomes incapacitated, or is removed.

A custodian may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the minor if the minor has attained the age of 14 years and to the successor custodian and by delivering the custodial property to the successor custodian.

If a custodian is ineligible, dies, or becomes incapacitated without having effectively designated a successor and the minor has attained the age of 14 years, the minor may designate as successor custodian, in the manner prescribed in (b) of this section, an adult member of the minor’s family, a conservator of the minor, or a trust company. If the minor has not attained the age of 14 years or fails to act within 60 days after the ineligibility, death, or incapacity, the conservator of the minor becomes successor custodian. If the minor has no conservator or the conservator declines to act, the transferor, the legal representative of the transferor or of the custodian, an adult member of the minor’s family, or another interested person may petition the court to designate a successor custodian.

A custodian who declines to serve under (a) of this section or resigns under (c) of this section, or the legal representative of a deceased or incapacitated custodian, as soon as practicable, shall put the custodial property and records in the possession and control of the successor custodian. The successor custodian by action may enforce the obligation to deliver custodial property and records and becomes responsible for each item as received.

A transferor, the legal representative of a transferor, an adult member of the minor’s family, a guardian of the person of the minor, the conservator of the minor, or the minor if the minor has attained the age of 14 years may petition the court to remove the custodian for cause and to designate a successor custodian other than a transferor under AS

13.46.030

or to require the custodian to give appropriate bond.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.180.
Accounting by and determination of liability of custodian.

A minor who has attained the age of 14 years, the minor’s guardian of the person or legal representative, an adult member of the minor’s family, a transferor, or a transferor’s legal representative may petition the court for

an accounting by the custodian or the custodian’s legal representative; or

a determination of responsibility, as between the custodial property and the custodian personally, for claims against the custodial property unless the responsibility has been adjudicated in an action under AS

13.46.160

to which the minor or the minor’s legal representative was a party.

A successor custodian may petition the court for an accounting by the predecessor custodian.

The court, in a proceeding under this chapter or in another proceeding, may require or permit the custodian or the custodian’s legal representative to account.

If a custodian is removed under AS

13.46.170(f)

, the court shall require an accounting and order delivery of the custodial property and records to the successor custodian and the execution of all instruments required for transfer of the custodial property.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.190.
Termination of custodianship.

The custodian shall transfer in an appropriate manner the custodial property to the minor or to the minor’s estate upon the earlier of the

minor’s attainment of 21 years of age with respect to property transferred under AS

13.46.030

or

13.46.040

unless the time of transfer of the custodial property to the minor is changed under AS

13.46.195

or

13.46.197

;

minor’s attainment of 18 years of age with respect to property transferred under AS

13.46.050

or

13.46.060

, unless the time of transfer of the custodial property to the minor is changed under AS

13.46.197

;

time specified in the transfer under AS

13.46.080

if the time of transfer of the custodial property to the minor is changed under AS

13.46.195

or

13.46.197

; or

minor’s death.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990; am § 33 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 48(c), ch. 45, SLA 2013, provides that this section, as amended by sec. 33, ch. 45, SLA 2013, applies “to a transfer that is made before, on, or after September 9, 2013.”

Sec. 13.46.195.
Changing the time for transfer of custodial property.

Subject to the requirements and limitations of this section, the time for transfer to the minor of custodial property transferred under AS

13.46.030

or

13.46.040

may be changed to a specified time other than the time the minor attains the age of 21 years. That time shall be specified in the transfer under AS

13.46.080

.

To specify a changed time for transfer to the minor of the custodial property under AS

13.46.030

except for the transfer by irrevocable gift, or under AS

13.46.040

, the words “as custodian for _____________________________________________________________________ (name of minor) until age _________ (age for delivery of property to minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” shall be substituted in substance for the words “as custodian for _____________________________________________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” in making the transfer under AS

13.46.080

.

To specify a changed time for transfer to the minor of the custodial property under AS

13.46.030

by irrevocable gift, the words “as custodian for _____________________________________ (name of minor) until age _________ (age for delivery of property to minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” or “as custodian for _____________________________________________________________________ (name of minor) until age _________ (age for delivery of property to minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, subject to the minor’s right to compel immediate distribution of the property by giving written notice to the custodian during the six-month period beginning on the minor’s 21st birthday” shall be substituted in substance for the words “as custodian for _____________________________________________________________________ (name of minor) under the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” in making the transfer under AS

13.46.080

.

The time for transfer to the minor of custodial property transferred under AS

13.46.040

may be changed under this section if the governing will or trust or nomination provides in substance that the custodianship is to continue until the time the minor attains a specified age. That time may not be earlier than the time the minor attains 18 years of age or later than the time the minor attains 25 years of age, and in that case the governing will or trust or nomination shall determine the time to be specified in the transfer under AS

13.46.080

.

The time for transfer to the minor of custodial property transferred under AS

13.46.030

may be changed under this section if the transfer under AS

13.46.080

provides in substance that the custodianship is to continue until the time the minor attains a specified age. That time may not be earlier than the time the minor attains 18 years of age or later than the time the minor attains 25 years of age.

If the transfer under AS

13.46.080

does not specify an age, the time for the transfer of the custodial property to the minor under AS

13.46.190

is the time when the minor attains 21 years of age.

If the transfer under AS

13.46.080

provides in substance that the duration of the custodianship is for a time longer than the maximum time permitted by this section for that type of transfer, the custodianship may continue until the minor attains the maximum age permitted by this section for that type of transfer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.197.
Extension of custodial term by custodian.

A custodian may extend the custodial term under this section to an age older than the age that is specified by this chapter or a transferring document made under AS

13.46.080

, subject to the right of the minor to compel immediate distribution under (c) of this section.

To extend the custodial term under (a) of this section, the custodian shall give the minor written notice of the custodian’s intent to extend the custodial term. The notice must specify the duration of the extension by indicating the new custodial term and must inform the minor of the minor’s right to compel immediate distribution under (c) of this section. The custodian shall give the notice during the later of the following periods:

the six-month period that precedes the last day of the custodial term; or

the six-month period that begins on the minor’s 18th birthday.

Rather than permit the extension of the custodial term, the minor may compel immediate distribution of all or part of the custodial property by giving written notice to the custodian

during the six-month period that begins on the day that is the last day of the current custodial term; or

within 90 days after receiving the custodian’s notice under (b) of this section.

If a minor does not exercise the minor’s right to compel distribution under (c) of this section, the custodial term shall be extended as indicated in the custodian’s notice given under (b) of this section, and the minor may not compel the immediate distribution of custodial property before the end of the custodial term, as extended.

A custodian may extend the custodial term more than once under this section.

In this section, “custodial term” means the time provided in or allowed by this chapter during which the custodian is directed to hold custodial property until the property is transferred to the minor.

History.

(§ 34 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 48(c),
ch. 45, SLA 2013, provides that this section applies “to a transfer that is made before, on, or after September 9, 2013.”

Sec. 13.46.200.
Applicability.

This chapter applies to a transfer within the scope of AS

13.46.010

made after December 31, 1990, if the

transfer purports to have been made under the Alaska Uniform Gifts to Minors Act; or

instrument by which the transfer purports to have been made uses in substance the designation “as custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act” or “as custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” of another state, and the application of this chapter is necessary to validate the transfer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.210.
Effect on existing custodianships.

A transfer of custodial property as defined in this chapter made before January 1, 1991, is validated notwithstanding that there was not specific authority in the Alaska Uniform Gifts to Minors Act for the coverage of custodial property of that kind or for a transfer from that source at the time the transfer was made.

This chapter applies to all transfers that were made before January 1, 1991, and that were made in a manner and form prescribed in the Alaska Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, except insofar as the application impairs constitutionally vested rights or extends the duration of custodianships in existence on January 1, 1991.

AS

13.46.190

,

13.46.195

, and

13.46.990

, with respect to the age of a minor for whom custodial property is held under this chapter, do not apply to custodial property held in a custodianship that terminated because of the minor’s attainment of the age of

19 after June 12, 1967, and before September 17, 1980; or

18 after September 16, 1980, and before January 1, 1991.

To the extent that this chapter, by virtue of (b) of this section, does not apply to transfers made in a manner prescribed under former AS 45.60 (Alaska Uniform Gifts to Minors Act) or to the powers, duties, and immunities conferred by transfers in that manner upon custodians and persons dealing with custodians, the repeal of AS 45.60 (Alaska Uniform Gifts to Minors Act) does not affect those transfers or those powers, duties, and immunities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.220.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)

Sec. 13.46.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“adult” means an individual who has attained the age of 18 years;

“benefit plan” means an employer’s plan for the benefit of an employee or partner;

“broker” means a person lawfully engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities or commodities for the person’s own account or for the account of others;

“conservator” means a person appointed or qualified by a court to act as general, limited, or temporary guardian of a minor’s property or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions;

“court” means the superior court;

“custodial property” means

an interest in property transferred to a custodian under this chapter; and

the income from and proceeds of that interest in property;

“custodian” means a person designated under AS

13.46.080

or a successor or substitute custodian designated under AS

13.46.170

;

“financial institution” means a bank, trust company, savings institution, or credit union, chartered and supervised under state or federal law;

“legal representative” means an individual’s personal representative or conservator;

“member of the minor’s family” means the minor’s parent, stepparent, spouse, grandparent, brother, sister, uncle, or aunt, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption;

“minor” means an individual who has not attained the age of 18 years, except that, when used in reference to the beneficiary for whose benefit custodial property is held or to be held, “minor” means an individual who has not attained the age at which the custodian is required under AS

13.46.190

,

13.46.195

, and

13.46.197

to transfer the custodial property to the beneficiary;

“personal representative” means an executor, administrator, successor personal representative, or special administrator of a decedent’s estate or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions;

“state” includes a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States;

“transfer” means a transaction that creates custodial property under AS

13.46.080

;

“transferor” means a person who makes a transfer under this chapter;

“trust company” means a financial institution, corporation, or other legal entity, authorized to exercise general trust powers.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990; am § 35 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 48(c), ch. 45, SLA 2013, provides that paragraph (11), as amended by sec. 35, ch. 45, SLA 2013 applies “to a transfer that is made before, on, or after September 9, 2013.”

Sec. 13.46.999.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 11 SLA 1990)